District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.12

Applicability of requirements on grants.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except where the law establishing authority for the grant exempts or modifies the requirements of this part by specific reference, any grant-making or grant-issuing authority established by District law shall be administered pursuant to the requirements of this subchapter.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1093, 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1082, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1053(b), 62 DCR 10905

“D.C. Law 20-61” referred to in this section, is the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Act of 2013, codified in various sections of this code.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

"D.C. Law 20-155" referred to in this section, is the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Act of 2014, codified in various sections of this code.

Section 1091 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Grant Administration Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1053(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1082 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1082 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1082 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1093 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1093 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “established by District law” for “established under D.C. Law 20-61.”
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “or D.C. Law 20-155.”
This section is referenced in § 1-328.13.